Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.890

General penalty.

A violation of any provision or section of this chapter, where no other penalty is provided for, and the violation of any rule or regulation adopted hereunder shall constitute a misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 124 s 58. Formerly RCW 22.09.560.]